Connecticut, session 2026, HB05277.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) The Labor Commissioner
2 and the Chief Manufacturing Officer, in consultation with the
3 Commissioner of Veterans Affairs, shall, within available
4 appropriations, post information on the Internet web sites of the Labor
5 Department and the Office of Manufacturing concerning benefits and
6 services available to veterans, as defined in section 27-103 of the general
7 statutes, in the state. Such information shall be in a form available for
8 downloading by an employer to display at such employer's place of
9 business.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5277 / File No. 42 1

HB5277 File No. 42
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Labor Commissioner and Chief Manufacturing
Officer to post information about benefits and services available to
veterans on their websites. This does not result in a fiscal impact to the
state or municipalities as it can be accomplished using current resources.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
HB5277 / File No. 42 2

HB5277 File No. 42
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5277
AN ACT CONCERNING THE POSTING OF VETERANS'
INFORMATION AND SERVICES FOR DISPLAY IN THE
WORKPLACE.